Utah statutes.
31A-18-101.   Scope -- Definitions.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in this title, this chapter and the rules adopted to implement it apply to all insurers authorized to do business in this state, including a reinsurer.

(2)  As used in this chapter, "cash" means a medium of exchange that a depository institution, as defined in Section 7-1-103, accepts for deposit and allows an immediate credit to an account in the depository institution, including the following in a depository institution:

(a)  a savings account; or

(b)  a certificate of deposit with a maturity date within one year or less from the day on which the certificate of deposit is acquired.

